Hawaii, session 2025, SB1602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The department of land and natural resources shall establish a Keauhou aquifer system monitoring pilot project. (b) Under the pilot project, the commission on water resource management, in collaboration with other agencies, shall: (1)  Collect data from the monitoring wells installed in the Keauhou aquifer system; (2)  Monitor groundwater levels in the Keauhou aquifer system; (3)  Conduct water salinity tests in the Keauhou aquifer system; (4)  Monitor the impacts of groundwater pumping on the health of coastal ecosystems and traditional and customary practices within the Keauhou aquifer system; (5)  Initiate public information meetings to report on the data collected; (6)  Conduct community outreach to guide the management of groundwater resources in the Keauhou aquifer system; (7)  Integrate new and existing studies and research into a plan for the responsible management of groundwater resources in the Keauhou aquifer system; and (8)  Conduct other related activities as the department deems necessary to carry out the purpose of the pilot project. (c) The department of land and natural resources shall submit an interim report to the legislature every six months, detailing, at minimum, groundwater levels and water salinity analysis in the Keauhou aquifer system. SECTION 2. Based on the department of land and natural resources' assessment of the Keauhou aquifer system monitoring pilot project, the department shall determine whether to continue, expand, or end the pilot project. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Keauhou aquifer system monitoring pilot project. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.